hr-HR: Kapacitet role filma: Dvostruki; Pet; Kvad; Jednostruki; Šest; Trostruki; Ostalo
fi: Kelan kapasiteetti: Tupla; Viisi; Neljä; Yksittäinen; Kuusi; Kolminkertainen; Muu
el: Χωρητικότητα καρουλιού: Διπλό; Πέντε; Τετραπλό; Μονό; Έξι; Τρία; Άλλο
nl: Capaciteit haspel: Dubbel; Vijf; Quad; Single; Zes; Driedubbel; Andere
en: Reel capacity: Double; Five; Quad; Single; Six; Triple; Other
ro-RO: Capacitate în role: Dublu; Cinci; Quad; Simplu; Sase; Triplu; Altele
ja: リールのキャパシティ: ダブル; ファイブ; クアッド; シングル; シックス; トリプル; その他
zh-CN: 卷筒容量: 双人; 五倍; 四倍; 单; 六倍; 三; 其他
bg-BG: Капацитет на макара: Двоен; Пет; Четворен; Единичен; Шест; Троен; Други
zh-TW: 捲軸容量: 雙倍; 五倍; 四倍; 單倍; 六倍; 三倍; 其他
pt-BR: Capacidade do carretel: Duplo; Cinco; Quádrupla; Único; Seis; Triplo; Outro
sk-SK: Kapacita cievky: Dvojitý; Päť; Štvoritý; Jeden; Šesť; Trojitý; Iné
cs: Kapacita navijáku: Dvojité; Pět; Quad; Jedna funkce; Šest; Trojitý; Jiné
th: ความจุม้วน: แบบคู่; แบบห้าเกลียว; แบบสี่เกลียว; แบบเดี่ยว; แบบหกเกลียว; แบบสามชั้น; อื่นๆ
ko: 릴 용량: 더블; 다섯; 쿼드; 싱글; 여섯; 트리플; 기타
pl: Pojemność szpuli: Podwójny; Piątka; Quad; Singiel; Szóstka; Potrójne; Inne
da: Spolekapacitet: Dobbelt; Fem; Firdobbelt; Enkelt; Seks; Tredobbelt; Andet
nb: Snellekapasitet: Dobbel; Fem; Quad; Enkel; Seks; Trippel; Annet
es: Capacidad del carrete: Doble; Cinco; Cuádruple; Individual; Seis; Triple; Otros
pt-PT: Capacidade da bobina: Duplo; Cinco; Quádruplo; Único; Seis; Triplo; Outro
fr: Capacité de la bobine: Double; Cinq; Quadruplé; Unique; Six; Triple; Autre
tr: Makara kapasitesi: Çift kişilik; Beş; Dörtlü; Tek; Altı; Üçlü; Diğer
ru: Емкость катушки: Двойной; Пять; Четыре; Один; Шесть; Три; Другое
lt-LT: Ritės talpa: Dviguba; Penki; Quad; Single; Šeši; Trys; Kita
it: Capacità della bobina: Doppio; Cinque; Quattro; Singolo; Sei; Tripla; Altro
de: Spulenkapazität: Doppel; Fünf; Vier; Einzel; Sechs; Dreifach; Sonstiges
hu: Tekercs kapacitása: Dupla; Öt; Négyszeres; Szimpla; Hat; Tripla; Egyéb
sv: Rullkapacitet: Dubbel; Fem; Quad; Enkel; Sex; Trippel; Övrigt
vi: Ding tích cuộn phim: Gấp đôi; Năm; Bốn; Đơn; Sáu; Gấp ba; Khác
sl-SI: Kapaciteta koluta: Dvojna; Pet; Četverna; Ena; Šest; Tri; Drugo